Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.040

Noncertified tribes—Demand—Extradition. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

The noncertified tribe whose court issued the warrant of arrest may demand the extradition of the tribal fugitive from a place of detention. The demand will be recognized if in writing, it alleges that the person is a tribal fugitive, the tribal court has jurisdiction, and is accompanied by either:

(1) A copy of the complaint, information, or other charging document supported by affidavit of the tribe having jurisdiction of the crime;

(2) A copy of an affidavit made before an authorized representative of the tribal court, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereupon; or

(3) A copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution thereof.

[ 2024 c 207 s 5.]